Hawaii statutes.
§603-37.5 Cure or waiver of defects.
(a) The circuit court of a circuit in which is commenced a civil case laying
venue in the wrong circuit shall transfer the case, upon or without terms and
conditions as the court deems proper, to any circuit in which it could have
been brought, or if it is in the interest of justice dismiss the case.

(b) Nothing in sections 603-36 to 603-37.5
shall impair the jurisdiction of a circuit court of any matter involving a
party who does not interpose timely and sufficient objection to the venue. [L
1972, c 88, §3(q)]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next